Colorado statutes. TITLE 5 Consumer Credit Code
ARTICLE 10
RENTAL PURCHASE AGREEMENTS

Section

PART 1 GENERAL PROVISIONS

PART 2 SCOPE OF ARTICLE

PART 3 DEFINITIONS

PART 4 DISCLOSURES AND FORM
OF WRITING

PART 5 LIMITATION ON AGREEMENTS
AND PRACTICES

PART 6 LIMITATIONS ON CHARGES

PART 7 REMEDIES

PART 8 ENFORCEMENT

PART 9 VIOLATIONS AND PENALTIES

PART 10 ADVERTISING